Massachusetts, session 194th, H3487.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a 
special commission to investigate and study the use of so-called double poles. The commission 
shall consider identifying how many double poles exist and the length of time each has been in 
place, the reason why such double poles have been in place for such time, and the process and 
timeline by which existing utility poles are removed following the transfer of attached services to 
a new pole. The commission shall also consider and may make recommendations on how best to 
enforce the provisions of Section 34B of Chapter 164 of the General Laws concerning the timely 
removal of double poles, investigate whether the current timeline for removing such poles is 
reasonable and adequate, investigate how to address barriers to remove such poles, investigate 
increasing utilization, improving functionality of attachment management systems (e.g., the 
National Joint Utilities Notification System (NJUNS), and identifying solutions to resolve 
communication issues among all parties, unlicensed attachments on utility poles and 

of 2 13 requirements that providers promptly register such attachments, the legal liability and potential 
use of indemnification agreements to facilitate the removal of abandoned attachments, whether 
or not certain costs may be recovered from ratepayers, and the promulgation of regulations by 
the Department of Public Utilities and Department of Telecommunications and Cable to 
effectively regulate double utility poles.  
The commission shall consist of 17 members: 1 of whom shall be the secretary of 
administration and finance, or the secretary’s designee; 1 of whom shall be the chair of the 
department of public utilities, or the chair's designee; 1 of whom shall be the commissioner of 
the department of telecommunications and cable, or the commissioner’s designee; 1 of whom 
shall be a representative of a municipal light board of commissioners or their designee; the house 
and senate chairs of the joint committee on municipalities and regional government; 2 members 
of the house of representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; 2 members 
of the senate, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; 3 municipal officials selected 
by the governor, 1 utility pole owner; 1 utility pole attacher; the executive director of the 
Massachusetts Municipal Association or their designee; and 1 private citizen, appointed by the 
governor, who shall serve as chair of the commission and shall not be an employee of any 
electric or telecommunications utility operating in the commonwealth.  
The commission shall file a report of its recommendations and proposed legislation, if 
any, with the clerks of the house and senate, the chairs of the house and senate committee on 
ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on municipalities and regional government 
not later than June 30, 2026.